Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1835
Public advocate; ex parte communications.

In any proceeding before the commission in which the public advocate is a party or is appearing for a party, the public advocate shall be considered a party for purposes of the restrictions on ex parte communications set forth in sections 75-130.01 and 84-914.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 35.